Tennessee, session 114, HB1367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
Beginning January 1, 2026, a law enforcement officer initiating a traffic stop or
pedestrian stop must inform the person stopped of the reason for the stop before
engaging the person in questioning related to an investigation of a possible criminal
offense or traffic violation. The officer may withhold the information required by this
section if the officer believes that doing so is necessary to protect life or property from an
imminent threat.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1367
001328
- 1 -